West Virginia, session 2026, SB1059.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMISSION. §24A-5-2c. Agreements between solid waste motor carriers and commercial customers. All agreements between a solid waste motor carrier and a commercial customer shall be in writing and shall be drafted in accordance with the commission’s rules and general orders governing such agreements: Provided, That such agreements may have a term of more than one year. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home